Georgia, session 2025_26, HB248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to income taxes,
is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"48-7-29.27.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Eligible geothermal installation expenses' means expenses incurred by a taxpayer for
a geothermal machinery installation for a residential dwelling that is owned by the
taxpayer.
H. B. 248 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 50 1178S
(2) 'Geothermal machinery and equipment' means all controls, tanks, pumps, heat
exchangers, and other equipment used directly and exclusively for a geothermal
machinery installation. Such term excludes any land or structural elements of any
building or any equipment ordinarily contained within a dwelling regardless of a
geothermal machinery installation.
(3) 'Geothermal machinery installation' means the installation of any:
(A) Heat pump that uses the ground or ground water as a thermal energy source to heat
a structure or as a thermal energy sink to cool a structure, together with necessary
geothermal and machinery equipment, which is placed in service on or after
January 1, 2026, and meets or exceeds applicable federal Energy Star requirements on
the date that it is placed in service; or
(B) System that uses the internal heat of the earth as a substitute for traditional energy
sources for water heating or active space heating or cooling, together with necessary
geothermal machinery and equipment, which is placed in service on or after
January 1, 2026, and meets or exceeds applicable federal Energy Star requirements on
the date that it is placed in service.
(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, a taxpayer shall be allowed
an income tax credit against the tax imposed by Code Section 48-7-20 that is equal to 25
percent of the eligible geothermal installation expenses incurred by the taxpayer for a
dwelling; provided, however, that such tax credit shall only be applied over a period of five
taxable years and shall not exceed $5,000.00 for any taxable year and no amount shall be
allowed or carried forward after such years. A taxpayer shall only be eligible for the tax
credit allowed under this Code section once per dwelling.
(c)(1) In no event shall the aggregate limit of tax credits allowed under this Code section
for any year exceed $2.5 million. In no event shall the total amount of any tax credit
allowed under this Code section for a taxable year exceed the taxpayer's income tax
liability. No such tax credit shall be allowed the taxpayer against prior years' tax liability.
H. B. 248 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 50 1178S
(2) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, no amount of the tax credit
shall be allowed to be carried forward to apply to the taxpayer's succeeding years' tax
liability.
(d) A taxpayer seeking to claim a tax credit pursuant to this Code section shall submit an
application to the department for preapproval of such tax credit in the manner specified by
the department. The department shall preapprove such application within 30 days based
on the order in which properly completed applications were submitted. In the event that
two or more applications were submitted on the same day and the amount of funds
available will not be sufficient to fully fund the tax credits requested, the commissioner
shall prorate the available funds between or among the applicants.
(e) This Code section shall stand repealed and reserved by operation of law on
December 31, 2031."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall be applicable to taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 248 (SUB)
- 3 -